New York, session 2025-2026, A3043.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The metropolitan transportation authority shall hold an 2 annual public seminar program on a topic relating to new innovations 3 that provide opportunities to discover new and emerging methods as such 4 relate to the purpose of the authority pursuant to section 1264 of the 5 public authorities law. The metropolitan transportation authority shall 6 determine the topic for each annual seminar and shall find qualified 7 presenters to present educational lectures on such topic to seminar 8 attendees. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04890-01-5